Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-4410
Licensed behavior analyst; licensed assistant behavior analyst; license required; when; application; minimum standards.

(1) Beginning one year after September 2, 2023, each applicant for licensure as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst shall submit an application that includes evidence that the applicant meets the requirements of the Uniform Credentialing Act for a license as a licensed behavior analyst or licensed assistant behavior analyst, as applicable.

(2) The board shall adopt rules and regulations to specify minimum standards required for a license as a licensed behavior analyst or a licensed assistant behavior analyst as provided in section 38-126. The board shall include certification by the certifying entity as a Board Certified Behavior Analyst® or a Board Certified Behavior Analyst-Doctoral® as part of the minimum standards for licensure as a licensed behavior analyst. The board shall include certification by the certifying entity as a Board Certified Assistant Behavior Analyst® as part of the minimum standards for licensure as a licensed assistant behavior analyst.

Laws 2023, LB227, § 10.